Utah statutes.
78A-10-304.   Vacancies.

(1)  The governor shall fill any vacancy on the Trial Court Nominating Commission.

(2)  If a commissioner is disqualified or otherwise unable to serve, the governor shall appoint a new commissioner of the same political party as the unavailable commissioner.

(3)  If a vacancy occurs among commission members who are also members of the Utah State Bar, the governor shall replace that commissioner with a person from a list of nominees submitted by the Utah State Bar as provided in Section 78A-10-302.

(4)  The governor shall ensure that each person who is appointed to fill any vacancy in the office of commissioner, other than a vacancy caused by expiration of term, is a member of the same political party as the commissioner whom the person replaced.

(5)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term of the commissioner being replaced and may not be reappointed.

